Hawaii, session 2026, HB1330.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that there is an urgent need for the replacement and relocation of the current Oahu community correctional center.  In 2020, the Honolulu city council approved a plan review use permit to move forward with the planning effort at the Halawa animal quarantine station site as the home of the new Oahu community correctional center. The legislature notes that the department of accounting and general services has completed the inmate population projection, updated the architectural space program, and request for interest, and is now at the point of developing and issuing the request for qualification. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to provide additional funding needed for the replacement and relocation of the Oahu community correctional center. SECTION 2.  The director of finance is authorized to issue general obligation bonds in the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary is appropriated for fiscal year 2025-2026 for the purpose of making critical capital improvements for the replacement and relocation of the Oahu community correctional center. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of accounting and general services for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  The appropriation made for the capital improvement project authorized by this Act shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal biennium for which the appropriation is made; provided that all moneys from the appropriation unencumbered as of June 30, 2028, shall lapse as of that date. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________